Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-346
Uniform inventory statements required.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall establish a uniform system of inventory statements for all county officers and such system, when established, shall be installed and used by all county officers.

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 1, p. 139;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-758;

R.S.1943, § 23-346.